Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-216
Fees; neglect or fraud in report; penalty.

If the Clerk of the Supreme Court shall omit to comply with the provisions of sections 24-214 and 24-215, or shall fail or neglect to keep a correct account of the fees by him received, or shall fail or neglect to make a report to the Governor of the state as herein provided by law, with intent to evade the provisions of said sections, he shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. If he shall intentionally make a false report under oath, he shall be guilty of perjury and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished as provided in section 28-915.

Laws 1909, c. 39, § 3, p. 224;

R.S.1913, § 1152;

Laws 1921, c. 213, § 4, p. 754;

C.S.1922, § 1081;

C.S.1929, § 27-216;

R.S.1943, § 24-216;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 99;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 3.